District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-921

Referendum on acts of directors.

Repealed.

History

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 485, ch. 397, § 21
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-921.
1981 Ed., § 29-1121.
1973 Ed., § 29-821.